Utah statutes.
78B-8-605.   Exemptions.

The provisions of this part do not apply to the transportation of:

(1)  wood chips, sawdust, and bark;

(2)  products transported by the owner of the property or his agent from which the products were removed; or

(3)  products for personal consumption incidental to camping and picnicking which is limited to the amount:

(a)  needed for the duration of the picnic or campout; and

(b)  used at the campsite.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

